verbs.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Pres +Past +Perf +Inf +1P +2P +3P +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
        Stem ;

LEXICON Stem
omistaa                 Infinitive ;
omistaa:omist           Tense ;
nähdä                   Infinitive ;
nähdä:nä                Tense ;
tulla                   Infinitive ;
tulla:tul               Tense ;
kisata                  Infinitive ;
kisata:kisa             Tense ;
syödä                   Infinitive ;
syödä:syö               Tense ;
voida                   Infinitive ; 
voida:voi               Tense ; 
vetää                   Infinitive ; 
vetää:vet               Tense ;
saada                   Infinitive ; 
saada:sa                Tense ;
murtaa                  Infinitive ; 
murtaa:murt             Tense ; 
olla                    Infinitive ; 
olla:ol                 Tense ;   
antaa                   Infinitive ; 
antaa:ant               Tense ;   
maksaa                  Infinitive ; 
maksaa:maks             Tense ;    
maata                   Infinitive ; 
maata:maka              Tense ; 
kuulla                  Infinitive ; 
kuulla:kuul             Tense ;  
ahertaa                 Infinitive ; 
ahertaa:ahert           Tense ; 
tietää                  Infinitive ; 
tietää:tiet             Tense ; 
ajaa                    Infinitive ; 
ajaa:aj                 Tense ;
nostaa                  Infinitive ; 
nostaa:nost             Tense ; 
mainita                 Infinitive ;
mainita:mainits         Tense ; 

LEXICON Infinitive
+Inf:      # ;

LEXICON Tense
+Pres:E                 VerbPerson ; 
+Past:i                 VerbPerson ; 
+Perf+Sg:nUt            # ;
+Perf+Pl:neet           # ;

LEXICON VerbPerson
+1P+Sg:n        # ;
+2P+Sg:t        # ;
+3P+Sg:%^       # ;
+1P+Pl:mme      # ;
+2P+Pl:tte      # ;
+3P+Pl:%^vAt    # ;

END
